New York, session 2025-2026, A7112.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. 1. The commissioner of health, in conjunction with the 2 commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of developmental disa- 3 bilities, and the commissioner of education is authorized and directed 4 to conduct a study and do research as to the effect of psychostimulants, 5 selective serotonin reuptake inhibitors, antidepressants and other drugs 6 prescribed for attention deficit disorder, attention deficit hyperactiv- 7 ity disorder, and the increasing rate of diagnosis of these conditions, 8 in school age children. 9 2. The study shall be conducted in accordance with rules, regulations 10 and standards determined by the commissioner of health, and the study 11 shall concentrate on harmful side effects of such drugs, the appropri- 12 ateness and effectiveness of tools and methods used to assess and diag- 13 nose the condition, the appropriateness of different medications, and 14 any demographic disparities in diagnosis. 15 3. The commissioner of health shall report the findings of the study 16 to the governor, the speaker of the assembly and the temporary president 17 of the senate on or before two years from the date this act shall take 18 effect. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06855-01-5